Georgia, session 2025_26, HB647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to incorporate the City of Mulberry, approved February 13, 2024 (Ga. L. 2024, p.
3518), is amended by revising the description of the corporate limits of the City of Mulberry
in Appendix A by adding at the end the following:
"2025 Addition 2
In addition to all other territory included within the corporate limits of said city, the
corporate limits shall specifically include the following described property, all of which is
located in Gwinnett County, Georgia:
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60351, Page 83, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
H. B. 647
- 1 -

LC 62 0136
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55566, Page 640, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 16983, Page 00256, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 57574, Page 558, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 53522, Page 648, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54183, Page 725, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 61256, Page 831, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54896, Page 481, Gwinnett
County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7100 239.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54896, Page 481, Gwinnett
County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7100 240.
H. B. 647
- 2 -

LC 62 0136
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60558, Page 204, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60964, Page 522, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60880, Page 817, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60803, Page 495, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59900, Page 752, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 57900, Page 563, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 47111, Page 114, Gwinnett
County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001 061.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 47111, Page 114, Gwinnett
County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001 575.
H. B. 647
- 3 -

LC 62 0136
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60769, Page 410, Gwinnett
County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001 057.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60769, Page 410, Gwinnett
County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001 129.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 51878, Page 414, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 12665, Page 61, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58187, Page 1, Gwinnett
County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7100 009.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58187, Page 1, Gwinnett
County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7100 091.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 26230, Page 248, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 50359, Page 235, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
H. B. 647
- 4 -

LC 62 0136
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 40218, Page 20, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 20035, Page 68, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 57252, Page 28, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59290, Page 851, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55389, Page 656, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 52276, Page 177, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54286, Page 541, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59338, Page 518, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60823, Page 402, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
H. B. 647
- 5 -

LC 62 0136
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60840, Page 780, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 39926, Page 211, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 32859, Page 148, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56626, Page 399, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 50534, Page 410, Gwinnett
County Land Records.
All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58297, Page 361, Gwinnett
100 County Land Records.
101 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
102 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001 066.
103 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
104 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7137 163A.
105 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
106 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7137 001.
H. B. 647
- 6 -

LC 62 0136
107 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
108 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7100 016.
109 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
110 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7135 006."
111 SECTION 2.
112 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 647
- 7 -